Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. Interstate Compact on Students of Military Families
§ 21-24-114.
Financing of the interstate commission.

The interstate commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.

In accordance with the funding limit established in subsection (e) of this section, the interstate commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the interstate commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the interstate commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the interstate commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

The interstate commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the interstate commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

The interstate commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the interstate commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the interstate commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the interstate commission.

The interstate commission may not assess, levy or collect more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per year from Wyoming legislation appropriations. Other funding sources may be accepted and used to offset expenses related to the state’s participation in the compact.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 21-24-115.
Member states; effective date; amendment.

Any state is eligible to become a member state.

The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than ten (10) of the states. The effective date shall be no earlier than December 1, 2007. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of nonmember states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the interstate commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

The interstate commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the interstate commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 21-24-116.
Withdrawal and dissolution.

Withdrawal:

Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state provided that a member state may withdraw from the compact by specifically repealing the statute, which enacted the compact into law;

Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same;

The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the interstate commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state. The interstate commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days of its receipt thereof;

The withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal;

Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the interstate commission.

Dissolution of compact:

This compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one (1) member state;

Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the interstate commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 21-24-117.
Severability and construction.

The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 21-24-118.
Binding effect of compact and other laws.

Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state.

Binding effect of the compact:

All lawful actions of the interstate commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the interstate commission, are binding upon the member states;

All agreements between the interstate commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms;

In the event any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

Notwithstanding W.S. 21-24-110(a)(iv), 21-24-111(d),

21-24-113

and 21-24-116(a)(iv) and any other provision of this compact, the state of Wyoming does not waive sovereign immunity by entering into this compact and specifically retains all immunities and defenses available to it as a sovereign pursuant to W.S. 1-39-104(a) and all other applicable law. Designations of venue, choice of law, enforcement actions and similar provisions should not be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Notwithstanding W.S. 21-24-114(b) and (e), or any other provision of this compact, the terms of this compact shall not require appropriation by future legislatures in violation of Article 16, Section 2 of the Wyoming Constitution.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 60, § 1.